Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 6. FOOD, DRUGS, ALCOHOL, AND HAZARDOUS SUBSTANCES

SUBTITLE D. HAZARDOUS SUBSTANCES

CHAPTER 503. HEALTH RISK ASSESSMENT OF TOXIC SUBSTANCES AND HARMFUL PHYSICAL AGENTS

Sec. 503.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1, Sec. 3.1639(99), eff. April 2, 2015.

(2) "Committee" means the Toxic Substances Coordinating Committee.

(3) "Department" means the Department of State Health Services.

(4) "Harmful physical agent" means a physical phenomenon, other than a toxic substance, that has or may have carcinogenic, mutagenic, teratogenic, or other harmful effects on humans, and includes:

(A) ionizing radiation, X-rays, gamma rays, ultraviolet light, or other electromagnetic radiation; and

(B) acoustical, thermal, or mechanical vibration.

(5) "Health risk assessment" means the use of objective data to characterize the potential adverse health effects that exposure to a toxic substance or a harmful physical agent may have on a person.

(6) "Toxic substance" means a substance that has or may have toxic, carcinogenic, mutagenic, teratogenic, or other harmful effects on humans, and includes a product that contains a toxic substance that poses or may pose a substantial hazard to human health.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1291, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1639(99), eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 503.002. TOXIC SUBSTANCES COORDINATING COMMITTEE. (a) The Toxic Substances Coordinating Committee is composed of one representative from the:

(1) department;

(2) Department of Agriculture;

(3) Texas Commission on Environmental Quality;

(4) Parks and Wildlife Department;

(5) Department of Public Safety of the State of Texas; and

(6) Railroad Commission of Texas.

(b) The chief administrative officer of each agency shall appoint the agency representative to the committee. A representative serves at the will of the chief administrative officer or until the representative terminates employment with the agency, whichever occurs first.

(c) The representative of the department serves as chairman of the committee.

(d) The department shall provide administrative support to the committee.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 11.250, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1292, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 503.003. MEETINGS; NOTICE. (a) The committee shall meet:

(1) at the call of the chief administrative officer of any member agency; or

(2) at least once each quarter on a meeting date set by the committee.

(b) The committee must provide public notice of the meeting date not later than the 15th day before the date on which the committee holds the meeting.

(c) The committee shall adopt rules for the conduct of its meetings.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 503.004. DUTIES OF COMMITTEE. (a) The committee shall coordinate communication among member agencies concerning each agency's efforts to regulate toxic substances and harmful physical agents.

(b) The committee shall develop a plan that provides for:

(1) intergovernmental cooperation concerning regulations to prevent and control the adverse health effects of toxic substances and harmful physical agents;

(2) a health risk assessment of emergency responses to accidents involving toxic substances or harmful physical agents;

(3) the coordination of agency programs relating to the prevention and control of adverse health effects resulting from exposure to toxic substances or harmful physical agents;

(4) the establishment of an integrated system to collect and manage information relating to toxic substances and harmful physical agents; and

(5) public education concerning the use of toxic substances and harmful physical agents and the potential adverse health effects.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 503.005. HEALTH RISK ASSESSMENTS. (a) In its capacity to protect the public health, the department shall coordinate health risk assessments conducted under this chapter.

(b) Each agency represented on the committee shall consult with and advise the department concerning health risk assessment activities when beginning a health risk assessment. The agency shall consult with and advise the department when taking the action in an emergency or as soon as possible after taking the action. This section does not require department approval of the agency's action or health risk assessment.

(c) Each agency represented on the committee shall use federal standards and health risk assessments, if appropriate, and avoid duplicating federal efforts.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 503.006. POWERS OF DEPARTMENT. (a) The department may establish an information management system and may collect and evaluate information relating to the use of toxic substances and harmful physical agents.

(b) The department may enter into agreements or contracts with federal, state, or local governmental entities, planning regions, and other public or private entities to implement this chapter.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 503.007. EFFECT ON OTHER LAWS. This chapter does not amend or affect the regulatory activities or procedures authorized under other law.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.